North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32. Fiduciaries.
Article 5. Compensation. [Repealed]

§§ 32-50 through 32-52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-139, s. 1, effective January 1, 2005, and applicable to payments made to a fiduciary on or after that date.

Cross References.

For present provisions relating to compensation of trustees and other fiduciaries, see

G.S. 32-53

et seq.